Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 180.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 180.1. A. Advertising If a public utility is the only


provider of a utility service within the utility’s service area,


advertising expenses shall not be included by a public utility in


its operating expenses for ratemaking purposes.


B. For purposes of subsection A of this section:


1. “Advertising” means:


a. the commercial use by a public utility of any media


including, but not limited to, newspaper, magazine,


radio and television to transmit a message to the


public or to such public utility’s customers, or

Req. No. 719 Page 1


b. the commercial use by a public utility of any printed


material to transmit a message to a substantial number


of members of the public or to a substantial number of


the public utility’s customers;


2. “Advertising” shall not mean:


a. periodic publications or reports required by the


bylaws of any public utility or electric cooperative,


b. any communication with customers and the public which


is strictly limited to energy conservation and


education,


c. any communication with customers and the public which


provides telephone customers with instruction in the


use of new, changed or improved features of their


telephone service, or information about time periods


or other conditions under which long distance calls


may be made at reduced rates, or information which


promotes the efficient use of the telephone network;


provided, that if the cost of providing such


information is to be treated as an operating expense


by the public utility, it shall be clearly marked or


identified to indicate the identity of the public


utility and the fact that the cost is paid for by the


ratepayers of the public utility,



Req. No. 719 Page 2


d. any communication with customers and the public for


giving of information or notice required by law or


otherwise necessary to warn of dangerous or hazardous


conditions,


e. routine classified telephone listings for the


convenience of customers,


f. informational inserts in customers’ bills,


g. any communication with customers and the public which


informs existing and potential customers of the


availability and conservation features of energy-


efficient appliances and equipment,


h. any communication with customers and the public which


relates to industrial development, and


i. any communication with customers and the public which


is in furtherance of conservation or load management


programs approved by the Corporation Commission; and


3. 2. “Public utility” means any individual, firm, association,


partnership, corporation or any combination thereof, other than a


municipal corporation or their lessees, trustees and receivers,


owning or operating for compensation in this state equipment or


facilities for:


a. producing, generating, transmitting, distributing,


selling or furnishing electricity,



Req. No. 719 Page 3


b. the conveyance, transmission, reception or


communications over a telephone system; provided, that


no authority not otherwise a public utility within the


meaning of this section shall be deemed such solely


because of the furnishing or furnishing and


maintenance of a private system, or


c. transmitting directly or indirectly or distributing


combustible hydrocarbon natural or synthetic natural


gas for sale to the public; and


4. “Appliances” and “equipment” mean those individual


appliances and space-conditioning equipment introduced by


manufacturers after November 9, 1978, which operate at a level of


efficiency at least twenty percent (20%) greater than appliances and


space-conditioning equipment of the same energy type manufactured


prior to that date.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-719 RD 1/16/2025 2:18:49 PM













Req. No. 719 Page 4